Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.657.080

Redirecting Title I funds based on academic performance audit findings.

The state board of education may direct the superintendent of public instruction to require a school district that has not submitted a final required action plan for approval, or has submitted but not received state board of education approval of a required action plan by the beginning of the school year in which the plan is intended to be implemented, to redirect the district's Title I funds based on the academic performance audit findings.

[ 2010 c 235 s 108.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.